Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2218
Two-year continuing education period, defined.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) through (6) of this section, two-year continuing education period means the period of twenty-four months commencing on January 1 and completed on December 31 of the following year.

(2) For a new real property appraiser credentialed prior to July 1 pursuant to section 76-2228.01, 76-2230, 76-2231.01, or 76-2232, two-year continuing education period means the period commencing on the date of initial credentialing and completed on December 31 of the following year.

(3) For a new real property appraiser credentialed on or after July 1 pursuant to section 76-2228.01, 76-2230, 76-2231.01, or 76-2232, two-year continuing education period means the period of twenty-four months commencing on January 1 of the year following the date of initial credentialing.

(4) For a new real property appraiser credentialed pursuant to section 76-2233 who held a valid credential of the same class to engage in real property appraisal practice under the laws of another jurisdiction on January 1 of the year in which the credential was issued by the board, two-year continuing education period means the period of twenty-four months commencing on January 1 of the year in which the credential was issued by the board.

(5) For a new real property appraiser credentialed pursuant to section 76-2233 who (a) did not hold a valid credential of the same class to engage in real property appraisal practice under the laws of another jurisdiction on January 1 of the year in which the credential was issued by the board and (b) was credentialed pursuant to section 76-2233 prior to July 1, two-year continuing education period means the period commencing on the date of initial credentialing and completed on December 31 of the following year.

(6) For a new real property appraiser credentialed pursuant to section 76-2233 who (a) did not hold a valid credential of the same class to engage in real property appraisal practice under the laws of another jurisdiction on January 1 of the year in which the credential was issued by the board and (b) was credentialed pursuant to section 76-2233 on or after July 1, two-year continuing education period means the period of twenty-four months commencing on January 1 of the year following the date of initial credentialing.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 19;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 15;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 10;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 38;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 35;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 52.